Illinois, session 104th, HB1300.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 705/3)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 23)7    Sec. 3. Additional contiguous territory having the the 8qualifications set forth in Section 1 may be added to any fire 9protection district as provided for in this Act in the manner 10following:11    (a) One percent or more of the legal voters resident 12within the limits of the proposed addition to the fire 13protection district may petition the court of the county in 14which the original petition for the formation of the fire 15protection district was filed, to cause the question to be 16submitted to the legal voters of the proposed additional 17territory whether the proposed additional territory shall 18become a part of any contiguous fire protection district 19organized under this Act and whether the voters of the 20additional territory shall assume a proportionate share of the 21bonded indebtedness of the district. The petition shall be 22addressed to the court and shall contain a definite 23description of the boundaries of the territory to be embraced   HB1300- 2 -LRB104 07304 RTM 17343 b1in the proposed addition and shall allege facts in support of 2such addition.3    Upon filing the petition in the office of the circuit 4clerk of the county in which the original petition for the 5formation of the fire protection district was filed, it shall 6be the duty of the court to fix a time and place of a hearing 7upon the subject of the petition.8    Notice shall be given by the court, or by the circuit clerk 9or sheriff upon order of the court of the county in which the 10petition is filed, of the time and place of a hearing upon the 11petition in the manner as provided in Section 1. The conduct of 12the hearing on the question whether the proposed additional 13territory shall become a part of the fire protection district 14shall be carried out in the manner described in Section 1, as 15nearly as may be. The question shall be in substantially the 16following form:17---------------------------------------------- 18    For joining the.... Fire 19Protection District and assuming a 20proportionate share of bonded 21indebtedness, if any. 22------------------------------------------------------------- 23    Against joining the.... Fire 24Protection District and assuming a 25proportionate share of bonded 26indebtedness, if any. HB1300- 3 -LRB104 07304 RTM 17343 b1-------------------------------------------------------------2    If a majority of the votes cast at the election upon the 3question of becoming a part of any contiguous fire protection 4district are in favor of becoming a part of that fire 5protection district and if the trustees of the fire protection 6district accept the proposed additional territory by 7resolution, the proposed additional territory shall be deemed 8an integral part of that fire protection district and shall be 9subject to all the benefits of service and responsibilities of 10the district as set forth in this Act.11    (a-5) Any fire protection district organized under the 12provisions of this Act may be simultaneously dissolved and 13consolidated into an adjoining fire protection district upon 14like petition, hearing and election as is provided under 15Section 1 of this Act for the organization of such district, 16except that the ballot for such election shall be in 17substantially the following form: 18--------------------------- 19    Shall the ... Fire Protection District 20dissolve and be consolidated        YES 21into the ... Fire 22------------------------------------------------------------- 2324Protection District?                NO 25---------------------- 26  HB1300- 4 -LRB104 07304 RTM 17343 b1    If a majority of the votes cast on the question at such 2election are in favor of such dissolution and consolidation, 3and if the board of trustees of the adjoining district agrees 4by resolution to accept the territory comprising the dissolved 5district, the circuit court of the county in which the 6petition was filed shall enter an order on the records of the 7court dissolving and consolidating such district. On the 8effective date of the simultaneous dissolution and 9consolidation, all the rights, powers, duties, assets, 10property, liabilities, indebtedness, obligations, bonding 11authority, taxing authority, and responsibilities of the 12former district shall vest in and be assumed by the fire 13protection district assuming the territory of the former 14district. 15    (b) The owner or owners of any tract or tracts of land, 16contiguous to an existing fire protection district and not 17already included in a fire protection district, may file a 18written petition, addressed to the trustees of the fire 19protection district to which they seek to have their tract or 20tracts of land attached, containing a definite description of 21the boundaries of the territory and a statement that they 22desire that their property become a part of the fire 23protection district to which their petition is addressed, and 24that they are willing that their property assume a 25proportionate share of the bonded indebtedness, if any, of the 26fire protection district.  HB1300- 5 -LRB104 07304 RTM 17343 b1    When such a petition is filed with the trustees, they 2shall immediately pass a resolution to accept or reject the 3territory proposed to be attached. If the trustees resolve in 4favor of accepting the territory, they shall file with the 5court of the county where the fire protection district was 6organized the original petition and a certified copy of the 7resolution, and the court shall then enter an order stating 8that the proposed annexed territory shall be deemed an 9integral part of that fire protection district and subject to 10all of the benefits of service and responsibilities of the 11district. The circuit clerk shall transmit a certified copy of 12the order to the county clerk of each county in which any of 13the territory affected is situated and to the State Fire 14Marshal.15    (c) Upon the annexation of territory by a district, the 16boundary shall extend to the far side of any adjacent highway 17and shall include all of every highway within the area 18annexed. These highways shall be considered to be annexed even 19though not included in the legal description set forth in the 20petition for annexation.21(Source: P.A. 98-1003, eff. 1-1-15.)